Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.13.170

Council meetings—Quorum—Rules—Voting.

All provisions of RCW 35A.12.110, as now or hereafter amended, and 35A.12.120, relating to council meetings, a quorum for transaction of business, rules and voting at council meetings, shall be applicable to code cities organized under this council-manager plan.

[ 1979 ex.s. c 18 s 26; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.13.170.]

NOTES:

Severability—1979 ex.s. c 18: See note following RCW 35A.01.070.